Nevada, session 83, AB11.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 360.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.105 [1. The] During January of each odd-numbered
year, the Department shall [in each even-numbered year,] submit to
the Nevada Tax Commission, at [the] a meeting [conducted by] of
the Commission , [pursuant to NRS 361.455 or, if no such meeting
is conducted during that year, at the meeting conducted by the
Commission pursuant to subsection 2,] a copy of the proposed
budget for the Department for the next 2 fiscal years and legislation
proposed by the Department [.
2. If the Nevada Tax Commission does not meet pursuant to
NRS 361.455 in an even-numbered year, it shall meet during June of
that year to accept the proposed budget for the Department and
legislation proposed by the Department.] for consideration by the
Legislature at its next regular session.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)